Utah statutes.
57-21-13.   Disclosure of information.
(1)  Conciliation agreements and the director's determination and order are
public records.
(2)  Subject to Subsection (3), neither the commission nor its staff may
divulge or make public information gained from any investigation, settlement
negotiation, conciliation, hearing, or administrative proceeding before the
commission, except as follows:
(a)  Information used by the director in making any determination may be
provided to all interested parties for the purpose of preparation for and
participation in the investigation and any proceedings before the commission
or court.
(b)  General statistical information may be disclosed provided identities of
individuals or parties are not disclosed.
(c)  Information may be disclosed for inspection upon proper request by the
attorney general or other legal representatives of the state or commission.
(d)  Information may be disclosed for information and reporting requirements
of the federal government.
(3) The commission or its staff may not divulge or make public any information
gained from any investigation, settlement negotiation, conciliation, hearing,
or administrative proceeding before the commission if a privacy interest
entitled to protection by law exists or the commission determines that
disclosure will not further the purposes of this chapter.
